Wyoming, session 2025, HB0254.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is appropriated ninety-three thousand
dollars ($93,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office. These funds shall be used only
for the purpose of the planning, design, purchase and
installation of microphones at each legislator's desk in
the chambers of the house of representatives. The
HB0254

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0721
microphones installed under this subsection are intended to
be used to enable the roll call votes of each legislator to
be heard within the chambers and during any broadcast of
the legislative proceedings.

(b) The funds appropriated in subsection (a) of this
section shall not be transferred or expended for any
purpose other than for the planning, design, purchase and
installation of microphones as required by subsection (a)
of this section. Any unexpended, unobligated amount
remaining from funds appropriated under this act shall
revert on June 30, 2026.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0254